apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
    <pardef n="a_on__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quant__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/el_que__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>que</l> 
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>que</l> 
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>els<b/>que</l> 
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>que</l> 
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><a/>els<b/>que</l> 
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><a/>el<b/>que</l> 
        <r>el<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="la_qual_cosa__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="nt"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="qui__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/el_qual__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>quals</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>qual</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>els<b/>quals</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>qual</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><a/>els<b/>quals</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l><a/>el<b/>qual</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="qual__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/el_qui__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>els<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>el<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que_/el_seu__rel">
    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>seves</l> 
        <r>el<b/>seu<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>seva</l> 
        <r>el<b/>seu<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>les<b/>seues</l> 
        <r>el<b/>seu<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>la<b/>seua</l> 
        <r>el<b/>seu<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>els<b/>seus</l> 
        <r>el<b/>seu<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>el<b/>seu</l> 
        <r>el<b/>seu<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="de/l_qual__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>les<b/>quals</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>la<b/>qual</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ls<b/>quals</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>l<b/>qual</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qual<s n="rel"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a/l_qui__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>les<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>la<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ls<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>l<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pe/l_qui__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r<b/>les<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r<b/>la<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>l<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ls<b/>qui</l> 
        <r>l<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="va/ar__vaux">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>m</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vaux"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ig</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vaux"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vaux"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vaux"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vaux"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r>ar<s n="vaux"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e r="LR" lm="a on"><i>a<b/>on</i><par n="a_on__rel"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="al qui"><i>a</i><par n="a/l_qui__rel"/></e>
<e lm="com"><i>com</i><par n="a_on__rel"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="del qual"><i>de</i><par n="de/l_qual__rel"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="del qui"><i>de</i><par n="a/l_qui__rel"/></e>
<e lm="el qual"><par n="/el_qual__rel"/></e>
<e lm="el que"><par n="/el_que__rel"/></e>
<e lm="qual"><i>qual</i><par n="qual__rel"/></e>
<e lm="el qui"><par n="/el_qui__rel"/></e>
<e lm="la qual cosa"><i>la<b/>qual<b/>cosa</i><par n="la_qual_cosa__rel"/></e>
<e lm="on"><i>on</i><par n="a_on__rel"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="pel qui"><i>pe</i><par n="pe/l_qui__rel"/></e>
<e lm="quan"><i>quan</i><par n="a_on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="quant"><i>quant</i><par n="quant__rel"/></e>
<e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__rel"/></e>
<e lm="què"><i>què</i><par n="que__rel"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="que el seu"><i>que<b/></i><par n="que_/el_seu__rel"/></e>
<e lm="qui"><i>qui</i><par n="qui__rel"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="anar"><p><l>va</l>                  <r>an</r></p><par n="va/ar__vaux"/></e>
